pl: Lokalizacja pojazdów: Rama; Przód; Lewa strona; Tył; Prawa strona; Siodło; Inne
el: Τοποθέτηση σε όχημα: Πλαίσιο; Μπροστά; Αριστερή πλευρά; Πίσω; Δεξιά πλευρά; Σέλα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Postavitev vozila: Ogrodje; Spredaj; Leva stran; Zadaj; Desna stran; Sedež; Drugo
zh-TW: 車輛放置: 車架; 前; 左側; 後; 右側; 座墊; 其他
nb: Plassering av kjøretøy: Ramme; Front; Venstre side; Bak; Høyre side; Sal; Annet
en: Vehicle placement: Frame; Front; Left side; Rear; Right side; Saddle; Other
da: Køretøjsplacering: Ramme; Front; Venstre side; Bag; Højre side; Sadel; Andet
cs: Umístění na dopravním prostředku: Rám; Předek; Levá strana; Zadek; Pravá strana; Sedlo; Jiné
ko: 장착 위치: 액자; 앞쪽; 왼쪽; 뒤쪽; 오른쪽; 새들; 기타
pt-PT: Posicionamento do veículo: Quadro; Parte dianteira; Lado esquerdo; Parte traseira; Lado direito; Selim; Outro
zh-CN: 车辆放置位置: 车架; 前; 左侧; 后; 右侧; 鞍座; 其他
lt-LT: Vieta transporto priemonėje: Rėmas; Priekis; Kairėje pusėje; Gale; Dešinėje pusėje; Balno formos; Kita
fr: Placement du véhicule: Cadre; Avant; Côté gauche; Arrière; Côté droit; Selle; Autre
hr-HR: Mjesto za postavljanje: Okvir; Sprijeda; Lijeva strana; Straga; Desna strana; Sjedalo; Ostalo
bg-BG: Разположение на превозното средство: Рамка; Отпред; Лява страна; Заден; Дясна страна; Седло; Други
hu: Elhelyezkedés a járművön: Keret; Elöl; Bal oldal; Hátul; Jobb oldal; Nyereg; Egyéb
sk-SK: Umiestnenie vozidla: Rám; Predný; Ľavá strana; Zadný; Pravá strana; Sedlo; Iné
tr: Araç Yerleştirme: Çerçeve; Ön taraf; Sol taraf; Arka taraf; Sağ Taraf; Eyer; Diğer
th: การจัดวางยานพาหนะ: โครง; ด้านหน้า; ด้านซ้าย; ด้านหลัง; ด้านขวา; เนื้อส่วนหลัง; อื่นๆ
sv: Fordonsplacering: Ram; Front; Vänster sida; Bak; Höger sida; Sadel; Övrigt
ru: Расположение на транспорте: Рама; Передняя часть; Левая сторона; Задняя часть; Правая сторона; Седло; Другой
vi: Vị trí xe: Khung; Trước; Bên trái; Sau; Bên phải; Yên xe; Khác
fi: Ajoneuvon sijoittelu: Runko; Etuosa; Vasen puoli; Takaosa; Oikea puoli; Satula; Muu
pt-BR: Colocação de veículo: Chassi; Dianteira; Lado esquerdo; Traseira; Lado direito; Sela; Outro
ja: 位置: フレーム; フロント; 左側; 後方; 右側; サドル; その他
es: Ubicación en el vehículo: Marco; Frontal; Lado izquierdo; Trasero; Lado derecho; Montura; Otros
it: Posizionamento nel veicolo: Telaio; Anteriore; Lato sinistro; Posteriore; Lato destro; Sella; Altro
de: Fahrzeugplatzierung: Rahmen; Vorne; Links; Hinten; Rechts; Sattel; Sonstiges
nl: Voertuigplaatsing: Frame; Voorkant; Linkerkant; Achterkant; Rechterzijde; Zadel; Andere
ro-RO: Amplasarea pe vehicul: Șasiu; Față; Stânga; Spate; Dreapta; Șa; Altele